South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 51 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 51-3-170.  For purposes of the South Carolina Code of Laws, a coastal beach is considered a state park. For purposes of this section, a "coastal beach" means the area from the high-water mark to the ocean. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----